California, session 20252026, AB756.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares that the purpose of this act is to approve an agreement pursuant to Section 3517.5 of the Government Code entered into by the state employer and the State Bargaining Unit 6. SEC. 2. The provisions of the memorandum of understanding prepared pursuant to Section 3517.5 of the Government Code and entered into by the state employer and State Bargaining Unit 6, dated ____, and requiring the expenditure of funds, are hereby approved for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 3517.6 and Section 3517.61 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. The provisions of the memorandum of understanding approved by Section 2 of this act requiring the expenditure of funds shall not take effect unless funds for these provisions are specifically appropriated by the Legislature. If funds for these provisions are not specifically appropriated by the Legislature, the state employer and State Bargaining Unit 6 shall meet and confer to renegotiate the affected provisions.SEC. 4. Notwithstanding Section 3517.61 of the Government Code, the provisions of the memorandum of understanding included in Section 2 of this act requiring the expenditure of funds shall also become effective if the provisions of the memorandum of understanding are approved by the Legislature in legislation other than the annual Budget Act.